Hawaii statutes.
§235-38 Equitable adjustment of formula.
If the allocation and apportionment provisions of this part do not fairly
represent the extent of the taxpayer's business activity in this State, the
taxpayer may petition for or the director of taxation may require, in respect
to all or any part of the taxpayer's business activity, if reasonable:

(1) Separate accounting;

(2) The exclusion of any one or more of the factors;

(3) The inclusion of one or more additional factors
which will fairly represent the taxpayer's business activity in this State; or

(4) The employment of any other method to effectuate
an equitable allocation and apportionment of the taxpayer's income. [L 1967, c
33, pt of §1; HRS §235-38]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next